Maine, session 132, LD1655.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 7 MRSA §219-D is enacted to read:
§219-D. Keeping chickens on residential property
A county or municipality may not adopt a regulation or ordinance that prohibits a
person from keeping chickens on that person's residential property. For purposes of this
section, "chicken" means a female domesticated bird that is raised for meat or eggs and
does not include a fully mature domesticated male chicken. This section may not be
construed to limit the home rule authority of a municipality.
Page 1 - 132LR1314(03)